Utah statutes.
70C-6-107.   Existing insurance -- Choice of insurer.

If a creditor requires insurance, upon notice to the creditor the debtor may provide the required insurance through an existing policy of insurance owned or controlled by the debtor, or through a policy to be obtained and paid for by the debtor, but the creditor may for reasonable cause decline the insurance provided by the debtor.

